Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2057.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 28-2448, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2448. Arizona centennial special plates; fund A. The department shall issue Arizona centennial special plates. The department shall use thirty-two thousand dollars $32,000 from the state highway fund, established by section 28-6991, to implement this section. The office of tourism shall design the Arizona centennial special plates. The design and color of the Arizona centennial special plates are subject to the approval of the department. The director of the department of transportation may allow a request for Arizona centennial special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director of the department of transportation allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director of the department of transportation and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the Arizona centennial special plates. B. Of the twenty-five dollar $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for renewal of special plates, eight dollars $8 is a special plate administration fee and seventeen dollars $17 is an annual donation. C. Notwithstanding section 28-2402, the fee for Arizona centennial special plates and for renewal of Arizona centennial special plates is $20 if the Arizona centennial special plates are issued to a commercial vehicle in a fleet as defined in section 28-2201 and registered pursuant to article 6 of this chapter. Of the $20 fee required by this subsection, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $12 is an annual donation. C. D. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and all donations collected pursuant to this section in the Arizona centennial special plate fund established by this section. D. E. The Arizona centennial special plate fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to this section. The director shall administer the fund. The first thirty-two thousand dollars $32,000 in the fund shall be reimbursed to the state highway fund established by section 28-6991. Not more than ten percent of monies deposited in the fund annually shall be used for the cost of administering the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. E. F. The director shall annually allocate monies in the fund to the university of Arizona to pay costs related to the maintenance and operations of the mining, mineral and natural resources educational museum. F. G. On notice from the director, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 7, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 7, 2026.